District of Columbia statutes.
31-5707

Repealed

Formation procedure.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1313, ch. 854, § 755
Oct. 5, 1962, 76 Stat. 752, Pub. L. 87-757, § 2
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1237(a), 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 35-1207.
1973 Ed., § 35-907.